Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2736.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 12, chapter 5, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 12-558.04, to read: START_STATUTE12-558.04. Limited liability; firearm hold agreement; definition A. An individual or a private entity is not liable for returning a FIREARM to the firearm owner at the termination of a firearm hold agreement. B. SUBSECTION A of this section does not apply to an action that arises from a firearm hold agreement if the action was the result of otherwise unlawful conduct on the part of the individual or private entity holding a firearm for another individual. C. For the purposes of this section, "firearm hold agreement" means a written or oral agreement between a FIREARM owner and another individual or a private entity in which the other individual or private entity takes physical possession of the firearm owner's lawfully possessed firearm at the owner's request, holds the firearm for an agreed period of time and returns the firearm to the OWNER according to the terms of the agreement.END_STATUTE